apertium-sme-smj.smj.lexc
LEXICON Root
 +Use/Circ: Prefixes ;				   !^G^ 
 +Cmpnd++Use/Circ:%- NounRoot ;	   !^G^ 
 @U.Cap.Obl@ ProperNoun ;  !^G^        ! These flags are for
 @U.Cap.Opt@ ProperNoun ;  !^G^        ! downcasing the propernouns
! AspellProp ;			               ! Only for aspell target !!
 NounRoot ;				   !^G^
! ProperNoun ;
! AspellAffix ;			 	           ! Only for aspell target !!
! ProperNounFirstPart ;	   !^G^
 AdjectiveRoot ;           !^G^
 VerbRoot ;                !^G^
 Adverb ;                  !^G^
 Particle ;                !^G^
 Subjunction ;             !^G^
 Conjunction ;             !^G^
 Adposition ;              !^G^
! Postposition ;           !^G^
! Preposition ;            !^G^
 Interjection ;            !^G^
 Pronoun ;                 !^G^
 +Use/CircN: Numeral ;                 !^G^ 
 Acronym ;			       !^G^
 Abbreviation ;			   !^G^
 Punctuation ;             !^G^



! ======================
! Sublexica for NounRoot
! ======================


! Prefixing and compounding
! =========================

LEXICON Prefixes	!^C^
 iehpe#+Use/Circ:iehpe# NounRoot;	!
 iehpe#+Use/Circ:iehpe# AdjectiveRoot;	!
 iehpe#+Use/Circ:iehpe# VerbRoot;		!
 ij%-+Use/Circ:ij%- AdjectiveRoot;  ! ij-biologalasj 
 ales#+Use/Circ:ales# NounRoot;	!
 badje#+Use/Circ:badje# NounRoot;	!
 guovdda#+Use/Circ:guovdda# NounRoot;	!
 maŋeldis#+Use/Circ:maŋeldis# NounRoot;	!
 maŋeldus#+Use/Circ:maŋeldus# NounRoot;	!
 maŋusj#+Use/Circ:maŋusj# NounRoot;	!
 miehte#+Use/Circ:miehte# NounRoot;	!
 oarjjel#+Use/Circ:oarjjel# NounRoot;	!
 oarjásj#+Use/Circ:oarjásj# NounRoot;	!
 sis#+Use/Circ:sis# NounRoot;	!
 sisŋutj#+Use/Circ:sisŋutj# NounRoot;	!
 sisŋátj#+Use/Circ:sisŋátj# NounRoot;	!
 vuosste#+Use/Circ:vuosste# NounRoot;	!
 åvddå#+Use/Circ:åvddå# NounRoot;	!
 åvdås#+Use/Circ:åvdås# NounRoot;	!


! Compounds are not treated as in sme. Partly this is ok (the reduce-middle issue hasn't come up)
! but partly it is not ok (a better treatment of hyphen would have been possible)
! Such a solution is sketched here

! R should be split like this:
! LEXICON R ! Default compound case. splits
! #:%- Rhyphen ; or even %-, for two-sided hyph
!      Rnohyphen ; !
! Then, the hyph- and nonhyph members of today's R would go to different lexicon.
! What does this take? A rewrite of the kultur- entries modeled on sme.

LEXICON R
 #+Use/Circ:# NounRoot;                      ! This is the normal case.		         
! # NounSecond ;			   ! Testing some quasisuff, cf. noun file       ^C^
 #@P.NeedNoun.ON@+Use/Circ:#@P.NeedNoun.ON@ VerbRoot;      ! Flag diacr declares that the compound   
 #@P.NeedNoun.ON@+Use/Circ:#@P.NeedNoun.ON@ AdjectiveRoot; ! needs a N tag later in the derivation  
 #+Use/Circ:%- NounRoot ;                        ! These 3 cases add a hyphen, so     
 #+Use/Circ:%-@P.NeedNoun.ON@  VerbRoot ;        ! Sem-julggaštus and the like	     
 #+Use/Circ:%-@P.NeedNoun.ON@  AdjectiveRoot ;   ! is allowed.			             
! # ProperNoun ;     ! Now, let us allow proper nouns as the 2nd part of com-^C^
 #+Use/Circ:%- ProperNoun ;  ! pounds. Thus: London-Hull, LondonHull, Hull-viessu     
                    ! and viessuLondon are now all ok. Some refinement could ^C^
                    ! perhaps be done, but corpus research is needed.	     ^C^
 +Cmpnd:%- # ;     ! This to take care of Oahpo- ja dutkandept.
!want this in speller

! It seems the P flag in the AdjectiveRoot entry is irrelevant, since there
! are no N + [A-N] compounds. The pointers to AdjectiveRoot are temorarily
! (030129) left for inspection, they (line 3 and 6 of R) should be removed
! if no deadjectival nouns turn up.

LEXICON RAbbr !From abbreviations and acronyms to avoid two hyphens: a-- and ...
 #+Use/Circ:# NounRoot;                      ! This is the normal case.		        
! # NounSecond ;			   ! Testing some quasisuff, cf. noun file      ^C^
 #@P.NeedNoun.ON@+Use/Circ:#@P.NeedNoun.ON@ VerbRoot;      ! Flag diacr declares that the compound  
 #@P.NeedNoun.ON@+Use/Circ:#@P.NeedNoun.ON@ AdjectiveRoot; ! needs a N tag later in the derivation 
 #+Use/Circ:%- NounRoot ;                        ! These 3 cases add a hyphen, so    
 #+Use/Circ:%-@P.NeedNoun.ON@  VerbRoot ;        ! Sem-julggaštus and the like	    
 #+Use/Circ:%-@P.NeedNoun.ON@  AdjectiveRoot ;   ! is allowed.			    
!# ProperNoun ;     ! Now, let us allow proper nouns as the 2nd part of com-^C^
!#:%- ProperNoun ;  ! pounds. Thus: London-Hull, LondonHull, Hull-viessu    ^C^
                    ! and viessuLondon are now all ok. Some refinement could^C^
                    ! perhaps be done, but corpus research is needed.	    ^C^
 +Cmpnd: # ;     ! This to take care of Oahpo- ja dutkandept.
!want this in speller




! Even-syllable stems
! -------------------

! 2syll stems
! - - - - - -

! 2syll stem with cg (note Q1)
LEXICON MUORRA
 +N:%> N-EVENSTRONGSTEM ;
 +N:%>Q1 N-EVENWEAKSTEM ; ! Weak grade Q1
 +N:» DenominalNounsMUORRA ;
 +N:» DenominalAdjsV1 ;
 +N:» DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +N:%> MUORRACmp ;

! 2syll stem with cg (note Q1) with comparatives
LEXICON GÁDDE
 +N:%> N-EVENSTRONGSTEM ;
 +N:%>Q1 N-EVENWEAKSTEM ; ! Weak grade Q1
 +N:» DenominalNounsMUORRA ;
 +N:» DenominalAdjsV1 ;
 +N:» DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +N:%> MUORRACmp ;
 +N+Comp:%>Q1 BUStem ;
 +N+Superl:%>Q1muss BUOREMUS ;
 +N+Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom:»Q1busj%> K ;
 +N+Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+Sg+Attr:»Q1busj%> ATTR ;
 +N+Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin:»Q1budtja%> GÅNÅGIS-EVEN ;

LEXICON ÅLGGO !Like MUORRA but no inessive/elative/illative sg, with comparatives
 +N:%> NE-EVENCASE ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:%>Q1 K ;
 +N+Sg+Abe:%>Q1#dagi K ;
 +N+Sg+Abe:%>Q1#dagá K ;
 +N+Sg+Abe:%>Q1#tagá K ;
 +N+Sg+Gen+Use/Ped:%>Q1 PxV ; !
 +N+Sg+Acc:%>Q1v K ;
 +N+Sg+Acc+Use/Ped:%>Q1 PxV ; !
! +N+Sg+Ine:%>Q1n K ;
! +N+Sg+Ine:%>Q1n%> PxC ; !^P^
! +N+Sg+Ela:%>Q1s K ;
! +N+Sg+Ela:%>Q1st%> PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Nom:%>Q1 K ;
 +N+Pl+Nom+Use/Ped:%>Q1 PxNomPlV ; !
 +N+Pl+Gen:%>Q1j K ;
 +N+Pl+Abe:%>Q1j#dagi K ;
 +N+Pl+Abe:%>Q1j#dagá K ;
 +N+Pl+Abe:%>Q1j#tagá K ;
 +N+Pl+Gen+Use/Ped:%>Q1j%> PxC ; !
 +N+Pl+Acc:%>Q1jt K ;
 +N+Pl+Acc+Use/Ped:%>Q1jd%> PxC ; !
 +N+Pl+Ill:%>Q1jda K ;
 +N+Pl+Ill+Use/Ped:%>Q1jdis%> PxCs ; !
 +N+Pl+Ine:%>Q1jn K ;
 +N+Pl+Ine+Use/Ped:%>Q1jn%> PxC ; !
 +N+Pl+Ela:%>Q1js K ;
 +N+Pl+Ela+Use/Ped:%>Q1jst%> PxC ; !
 +N+Pl+Com:%>Q1j K ;
 +N+Pl+Com+Use/Ped:%>Q1j%> PxC ; !
 +N+Sg+Com+Use/Sub:%>Q1X5jna K ; !
 +N+Sg+Com:%>Q1X5jn K ; ! X5 for o:u in ComSg. Note two dummies in a row!
 +N+Sg+Com+Use/Ped:%>Q1X5jn%> PxC ; !
 +N:» DenominalNounsMUORRA ;
 +N:» DenominalAdjsV1 ;
 +N:» DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +N:%> MUORRACmp ;
 +N+Comp:%>Q1 BUStem ;
 +N+Superl:%>Q1muss BUOREMUS ;
 +N+Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom:»Q1busj%> K ;
 +N+Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+Sg+Attr:»Q1busj%> ATTR ;
 +N+Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin:»Q1budtja%> GÅNÅGIS-EVEN ;

LEXICON MIEHTE !Like MUORRA but no locative/elative/illative sg
 +N:%> NE-EVENCASE ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:%>Q1 K ;
 +N+Sg+Abe:%>Q1#dagi K ;
 +N+Sg+Abe:%>Q1#dagá K ;
 +N+Sg+Abe:%>Q1#tagá K ;
 +N+Sg+Gen+Use/Ped:%>Q1 PxV ; !
 +N+Sg+Acc:%>Q1v K ;
 +N+Sg+Acc+Use/Ped:%>Q1 PxV ; !
! +N+Sg+Ine:%>Q1n K ;
! +N+Sg+Ine:%>Q1n%> PxC ; !^P^
! +N+Sg+Ela:%>Q1s K ;
! +N+Sg+Ela:%>Q1st%> PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Nom:%>Q1 K ;
 +N+Pl+Nom+Use/Ped:%>Q1 PxNomPlV ; !
 +N+Pl+Gen:%>Q1j K ;
 +N+Pl+Abe:%>Q1j#dagi K ;
 +N+Pl+Abe:%>Q1j#dagá K ;
 +N+Pl+Abe:%>Q1j#tagá K ;
 +N+Pl+Gen+Use/Ped:%>Q1j%> PxC ; !
 +N+Pl+Acc:%>Q1jt K ;
 +N+Pl+Acc+Use/Ped:%>Q1jd%> PxC ; !
 +N+Pl+Ill:%>Q1jda K ;
 +N+Pl+Ill+Use/Ped:%>Q1jdis%> PxCs ; !
 +N+Pl+Ine:%>Q1jn K ;
 +N+Pl+Ine+Use/Ped:%>Q1jn%> PxC ; !
 +N+Pl+Ela:%>Q1js K ;
 +N+Pl+Ela+Use/Ped:%>Q1jst%> PxC ; !
 +N+Pl+Com:%>Q1j K ;
 +N+Pl+Com+Use/Ped:%>Q1j%> PxC ; !
 +N+Sg+Com+Use/Sub:%>Q1X5jna K ; !
 +N+Sg+Com:%>Q1X5jn K ; ! X5 for o:u in ComSg. Note two dummies in a row!
 +N+Sg+Com+Use/Ped:%>Q1X5jn%> PxC ; !
 +N:» DenominalNounsMUORRA ;
 +N:» DenominalAdjsV1 ;
 +N:» DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +N:%> MUORRACmp ;

LEXICON NounRoot
 áhttje#bielle+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:áhttje#bielle MUORRA; !
 akkommodasjåvnnå+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgN:akkommodasjon%> R ; !
 ålggo+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:ålggo ÅLGGO; !
 álmmuk#digge+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:álmmuk#digge MUORRA; !
 álmmuk#låhko+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgN:álmmuk#låk%> R ; !
 artiskohkka MUORRA ; !^LOAN
bádne MUORRA ;
 bal0loaŋ0ŋa:bal'loaŋ'ŋa MUORRA ; !^LOAN
 bál0loaŋ0ŋa+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgN:ballong%> R ; !
 basse+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:basse MUORRA; !
 bielle+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:bielle MUORRA; !
 bitumena+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgN:bitumen%> R ; !
boahto MUORRA ;
boas0sjo:boas'sjo GÁDDE;
buorgga MUORRA ;
 dållå#sadje+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:dållå#sadje MUORRA; !
 dáro#giella+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/SgN:dáro#giel%> R ; !
davve ÅLGGO ;
 doajmma#konsesjåvnnå+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgN:doajmma#konsesjon%> R ; !
doares#muorra MUORRA ;
 dulvve+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:dulvve GÁDDE; !
 duohke+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:duohke MIEHTE; !
 duohke+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:duohke MIEHTE; !
duvdda MUORRA ;
 eksempel+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgN:exempel%> R ; !
 ekspansjåvnnå+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgN:ekspansjon%> R ; !
 ekstensjåvnnå+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgN:extension%> R ; !
fárffo MUORRA ;
 gádde+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:gádde GÁDDE; !
 gájttsa+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:gájttsa MUORRA; !
 gárjjel#giella+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/SgN:gárjjel#giel%> R ; !
 gasska+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:gasska GÁDDE; !
 gibme#tjuktje+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:gibme#tjuktje MUORRA; !
 gintal#mæsso#biejvve+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:gintal#mæsso#biejvve MUORRA; !
 girjje#giella+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/SgN:girjje#giel%> R ; !
 guovva#mánno+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:guovva#mánno MUORRA; !
 hebrea#giella+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/SgN:hebrea#giel%> R ; !
 ieddne-rávkke+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Use/Sub:ieddne-rávkke MUORRA; !
 indivijdda+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgN:individ%> R ; !
 jahke#bielle+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/SgN:jahke#biel%> R ; !
 jiehkke+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:jiehkke MUORRA; !
 kapasitæhtta+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgN:kapacitet%> R ; !
 konsentrasjåvnnå+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgN:konsentrasjon%> R ; !
krijtta MUORRA ;
 kvalitæhtta+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgN:kvalitet%> R ; !
likse MUORRA ;
 logopeda+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgN:logoped%> R ; !
lulle ÅLGGO ;
maŋŋe ÅLGGO ;
 mánno+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:mánno MUORRA; !
 mediatæhkka+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgN:mediatek%> R ; !
 mopeda+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgN:moped%> R ; !
 murkko+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:murkko MUORRA; !
 njuktja#mánno+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:njuktja#mánno MUORRA; !
 nubbe#giella+N+CmpN/SgG+DefSgNomCmp+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen:nuppe#giel%> R ; !
nuortta ÅLGGO ;
 nuortte+Use/Sub:nuortte MIEHTE; !
 oajvve+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:oajvve GÁDDE; !
 oarjjel%>+CmpN/SgN:oarjjel%> R; !
 oarjje+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:oarjje ÅLGGO; !
 panela+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgN:panel%> R ; !
 pinsæhtta+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgN:pincett%> R ; !
 poassta#kåntåvrrå+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:poassta#kåntåvrrå MUORRA; !
 prosænnta+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgN:procent%> R ; !
 rabdda+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:rabdda GÁDDE; !
 ráddná#goahte+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgN:ráddná#gåt%> R ; !
rásspa MUORRA ;
 rihta#bielle+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/SgN:rihta#biel%> R ; !
 ruovdde#båvddå+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:ruovdde#båvddå MUORRA; !
 saláhtta+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgN:sallad%> R ; !
siejnne MUORRA ;
 sirena+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgN:siren%> R ; !
 skåvllå#salljo+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:skåvllå#salljo MUORRA; !
 soavvo+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:soavvo MUORRA; !
 stáhta#budsjæhtta+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgN:stáhta#budjett%> R ; !
 taksonomija+N+CmpN/SgN:taksonomi%> R ; !NOR
 tijmma#bielle+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:tijmma#bielle MUORRA; !
 tjaktja+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:tjaktja GÁDDE; !
 tjalmme#bielle+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/SgN:tjalmme#biel%> R ; !
tráhppá MUORRA ;
 válgga#jahke+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/SgN:válgga#jak%> R ; !
várppa MUORRA ;
 vuodo#giella+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/SgN:vuodo#giel%> R ; !
 vuoksá+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:vuoksá MUORRA; !
 vuolle+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:vuolle ÅLGGO; !
